Massachusetts, session 194th, H3389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, all state grants,
federal grant awards, federal subgrants and subsidies for the Dukes County Sheriff’s Regional
Emergency Communication Center shall be exempt from chargebacks of fringe benefits, indirect
costs and payroll taxes; imposed on salary costs moved back as reimbursement from the Dukes
County Sheriff’s appropriation to the awarding agency’s appropriation under any
Interdepartmental Service Agreement between the Dukes County Sheriff and another state
agency.
of 1